Illinois, session 104th, HB4963.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Access to Justice Act is amended by adding 5Section 50 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 95/50 new)7    Sec. 50. Remote Court Filing Task Force.8    (a) The purpose of the Remote Court Filing Task Force is to 9help ensure electronic or other remote means of filing court 10documents are user-friendly and accessible to all Illinoisans, 11including individuals who appear pro se. The Task Force shall 12pay special attention to the need for remote means of filing in 13times of emergency.14    (b) The Task Force shall:15        (1) research and evaluate the existing ability of 16    litigants to file court documents remotely across 17    Illinois, including identifying barriers for pro se 18    litigants, people with a primary language other than 19    English, people in crisis, people with disabilities, and 20    people with low-literacy;21        (2) research and evaluate approaches to address any 22    barriers identified by the Task Force to increase access 23    and usability for remote filing for all Illinoisans; and  HB4963- 2 -LRB104 18276 JRC 31716 b1        (3) make recommendations to reduce barriers for 2    litigants to remotely file court documents and improve 3    access and usability of remote filing statewide.4    (c) The Remote Filing Task Force is created. The Task 5Force shall be composed of 17 members appointed as follows:6        (1) one member of the Illinois Senate, appointed by 7    the President of the Senate;8        (2) one member of the Illinois Senate, appointed by 9    the Senate Minority Leader;10        (3) one member of the Illinois House of 11    Representatives, appointed by the Speaker;12        (4) one member of the Illinois House of 13    Representatives, appointed by the House Minority Leader;14        (5) a representative from the Office of the Governor, 15    appointed by the Governor;16        (6) a representative of the Supreme Court appointed by 17    the Supreme Court;18        (7) 10 members appointed by the Supreme Court, 19    including:20            (A) a representative of an association that 21        represents attorneys statewide;22            (B) a representative of an association that 23        represents attorneys of a county with a population of 24        more than 5,000,000 people;25            (C) a representative of a legal aid organization 26        serving people experiencing poverty serving a   HB4963- 3 -LRB104 18276 JRC 31716 b1        community of over 5,000,000 people;2            (D) a representative of a legal aid organization 3        serving people experiencing poverty with a service 4        area of multiple counties;5            (E) 2 representatives of a statewide association 6        representing court clerks;7            (F) a current or retired State court judge;8            (G) a representative of a domestic violence 9        partner organization of direct service providers that 10        administers the Illinois Domestic Violence Hotline;11            (H) a representative of an organization that 12        advocates on behalf of people with disabilities; and13            (I) a representative of an organization that 14        advocates on behalf of immigrant families.15    (d) Members must be adult residents of Illinois and serve 16without compensation.17    (e) Appointments shall be made 30 days from the effective 18date of this Act.19    (f) The Task Force shall elect co-chairs from its 20membership who have the authority to determine meeting 21schedules, hearing schedules, and agendas.22    (g) The circuit court clerks shall provide any relevant 23data requested to the Task Force related to its duties.24    (h) The Task Force shall submit a report containing its 25findings and any recommendations to the Supreme Court and the 26General Assembly by October 1, 2027.  HB4963- 4 -LRB104 18276 JRC 31716 b1    (i) At the direction of the Supreme Court, the 2Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts shall provide 3administrative support to the Task Force including providing 4requested data. The Administrative Office of the Illinois 5Courts may collaborate with any member of the Task Force or the 6organization that the member represents to help provide any 7necessary staff support.8    (j) Dissolution of Task Force. The Task Force is dissolved 9on October 2, 2027. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.